Alaska statutes. Title 7. Boroughs.
Annotations

Repeal of Title 7. —

Chapter 118, SLA 1972, repealed Title 7 (Boroughs) and former Title 29 (Municipal Corporations) and enacted new Title 29 (Municipal Government) in lieu of the repealed provisions.

Repealed Title 7 derived from §§ 1.01 — 1.03, ch. 146, SLA 1961; §§ 2.01 — 2.14, ch. 146, SLA 1961; §§ 3.01 — 3.06, ch. 146, SLA 1961; §§ 3.31 — 3.35, ch. 146, SLA 1961; §§ 3.71 — 3.80, ch. 146, SLA 1961; § 3.91 — 1.03, ch. 146, SLA 1961; §§ 4.01 — 4.16, ch. 146, SLA 1961; §§ 5.01 — 5.10, ch. 146, SLA 1961; §§ 6.01 — 6.11, ch. 146, SLA 1961; §§ 7.01, 7.02, ch. 146, SLA 1961; §§ 7.11 — 7.21, ch. 146, SLA 1961; §§ 7.41 — 7.52, ch. 146, SLA 1961; §§ 8.01, ch. 146, SLA 1961; §§ 1 — 18, ch. 110, SLA 1962; §§ 5 — 8, ch. 52, SLA 1963; §§ 1, 2, ch. 53, SLA 1963; § 1, ch. 81, SLA 1963; § 5, ch. 34, SLA 1964; § 1, ch. 35, SLA 1964; § 1, ch. 61, SLA 1964; § 1, ch. 8, SLA 1965; §§ 1, 2, ch. 82, SLA 1965; §§ 1, 2, ch. 100, SLA 1965; §§ 4, ch. 100, SLA 1965; § 4, ch. 7, SLA 1966; § 1, ch. 47, SLA 1966; § 59, ch. 98, SLA 1966; §§ 4, 5, ch. 109, SLA 1966; §§ 1 — 7, ch. 129, SLA 1966; § 5, ch. 157, SLA 1966; § 7, ch. 157, SLA 1966; § 1, ch. 16, FSSLA 1967; § 1, ch. 34, SLA 1967; § 1, ch. 42, SLA 1967; §§ 1, 2, ch. 59, SLA 1967; §§ 1, 2, ch. 70, SLA 1967; §§ 1, 2, ch. 113, SLA 1967; §§ 3, 4, ch. 135, SLA 1968; § 1, ch. 143, SLA 1968; §§ 1 — 3, ch. 156, SLA 1968; § 2, ch. 171, SLA 1968; § 2, ch. 182, SLA 1968; § 3 ch. 70, SLA 1969; § 3, ch. 86, SLA 1969; § 1, ch. 110, SLA 1969; § 5, ch. 116, SLA 1969; § 7, ch. 116, SLA 1969; § 4, ch. 69, SLA 1970; § 8, ch. 113, SLA 1970; § 1, ch. 213, SLA 1970; § 3, ch. 218, SLA 1970; § 1, ch. 6, SLA 1971; § 3, ch. 12, SLA 1971; § 5, ch. 32, SLA 1971; § 1, ch. 8, SLA 1972; § 2, ch. 40, SLA 1972.

Case notes which appeared under provisions of repealed Title 7 and former Title 29 have been relocated under similar provisions of new Title 29.